Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-136
Foreign company; dissolution; effect on actions.

The dissolution of any foreign insurance company or association shall not take away or impair the right of any person to commence an action in this state against such companies or associations, or their statutory successors as agents thereof, and procure service upon such companies or their statutory successors, as herein provided, for any liability previously incurred.

Laws 1935, c. 103, § 1, p. 337;

Laws 1937, c. 99, § 1, p. 347;

C.S.Supp.,1939, § 44-207;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-207;

R.S.1943, § 44-136.